Wyoming, session 2026, HB0162.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlviii) is amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

HB0162

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0236
(xlviii) The property of first responders to the
extent provided by this paragraph. The following shall
apply to the exemption under this paragraph:

(A) The exemption for first responders is
limited to an annual exemption of six thousand dollars
($6,000.00) of assessed value;

(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C)
of this paragraph, in order to receive the exemption
provided by this paragraph, the claimant shall file a sworn
claim on or before the fourth Monday in May with the county
assessor of the county in which the property against which
the exemption is sought is located indicating:

(I) The claimant's right to the
exemption. The claimant shall provide documentation that
the claimant is a first responder by providing one (1) of
the following indicating that the claimant is a first
responder:

(1) An identification card issued
by the claimant's employer;
HB0162

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0236

(2) A pay stub that is not more
than two (2) months old;

(3) An official letter that is
not more than one (1) month old from the claimant's
employer;

(4) An email from the claimant's
employer that was issued from the employer's official email
address.

(II) That the claimant or the
claimant's spouse is an owner of the property, that the
property is the subject of a trust created by or for the
benefit of the claimant or the claimant's spouse, or the
claimant or the claimant's spouse is a purchaser on a valid
and effective contract for deed for the property and
evidence of the contract for deed has been recorded with
the county clerk;

HB0162

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0236
(III) The total tax benefit that the
claimant expects to receive under this paragraph to the
best of the claimant's knowledge;

(IV) That the exemption for real
property is for the principal residence of the claimant or
the claimant's spouse;

(V) That exemption is not being
claimed in more than one (1) county in this state.

(C) After filing a sworn claim pursuant to
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, in subsequent years the
claimant shall remain qualified for the tax exemption
provided by this paragraph if the claimant contacts the
assessor's office by telephone, mail or other communication
method on or before the fourth Monday in May and confirms
that the claimant continues to meet the requirements set
forth in this paragraph;

(D) A county assessor shall notify
taxpayers of the exemption provided by this paragraph with
the assessment schedule sent under W.S. 39-13-103(b)(vii).
HB0162

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0236
The notification shall include instructions and timelines
for applying for the exemption, including information on
the ability of a claimant to confirm qualification for the
exemption in subsequent years by contacting the assessor's
office by telephone, mail or other communication method;

(E) As used in this paragraph:

(I) "Employer" includes an
organization where the person volunteers as a firefighter
or ambulance personnel in Wyoming;

(II) "First responder" means a person
who is currently employed as a peace officer or dispatcher
in Wyoming or a person who is currently employed or who
currently volunteers as a firefighter or ambulance
personnel in Wyoming;

(III) "Peace officer" means:

(1) Any duly authorized sheriff,
under sheriff or deputy sheriff who has qualified pursuant
to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707;
HB0162

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0236

(2) Any duly authorized member of
a municipal police force, a college or university campus
police force or the Wyoming highway patrol who has
qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707;

(3) Agents of the division of
criminal investigation appointed pursuant to W.S. 9-1-613
who have qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through
9-1-707;

(4) Any duly authorized arson
investigator employed by the state fire marshal who has
qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707;

(5) Any duly authorized detention
officer who has qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through
9-1-707.

Section 2. This act is effective January 1, 2027.

(END)
HB0162